<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR891113-0106 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.11-13-89.f2.A1105</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 54, No. 217 / Monday, November 13, 1989/ Notices<ITAG tagnum="52">OFFICE OF PERSONNEL MANAGEMENT</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Federal Personnel Manual Letter 792-19, Establishing a Drug-Free FederalWorkplace</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Office of Personnel Management.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Response to comments; final publication; notice.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Office of Personnel Management publishes notice ofthe final version of Federal Personnel Manual Letter 792-19, Establishinga Drug-Free Federal Workplace prior to its issuance.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>December 13, 1989.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Carrol Kinsey, (202) 632-5087.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2>This final Federal Personnel ManualLetter was developed in accordance with section 6(a)(1) of Executive Order12564, A Drug-Free Federal Workplace, issued on September 15, 1986. OnNovember 28, 1986, OPM issued Federal Personnel Manual (FPM) Letter 792-16,Establishing a Drug-Free Federal Workplace, to Executive branch agenciescovered under the jurisdiction of Executive Order 12564. On March 9, 1987,OPM issued FPM Letter 792-17, amending three provisions of FPM Letter 792-16.On December 30, 1988, OPM issued FPM Letter 792-18, notifying agenciesof actions they should take to bring their Drug-Free Workplace plans intocompliance with section 628 of the Treasury, Postal, and General GovernmentAppropriations Act of 1989, Public Law No. 100-440.FPM Letters generally are advisory guidance for supervisors and personnelspecialists to use as management tools and ordinarily would not be publishedunder formal rulemaking procedures. In this FPM Letter, policies for Federalagencies and employees required by law or Government-wide regulation arestated in terms of ``must,'' ``shall,'' or ``will.'' Policies which arenot required by law or Government-wide regulation, but which are highlyrecommended, are stated in terms of ``should.'' Policy guidance which isset forth for the agency's consideration is stated in terms of ``may,''``can,'' or ``could.''The publication of the draft FPM Letter 792-19 in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> on April 6, 1989, did not mean that OPM was embarkingupon a formal rulemaking. It afforded interested parties the opportunityto comment on the draft FPM Letter before its issuance in final form.In response to that notice and opportunity for comment, OPM received the10 written comments discussed below. In recognition of the important rolethat may be played by interested members of the public even in providingtheir comments on advisory personnel guidance, OPM has considered the commentsas indicated below and has made corresponding changes to the draft FPMLetter.In preparing draft FPM Letter 792-19, OPM consolidated all of the existingFPM Letters on the subject of a Drug-Free Federal Workplace in one issuance.FPM Letter 792-19 is a compilation and update of FPM Letters 792-16, 792-17,and 792-18. It incorporates the text of the preceding FPM Letters and anyamendments made necessary by subsequent legislation. This compilation isdeemed necessary as a service to Federal agency officials and other interestedparties and as an opportunity to update the original FPM Letter issuedon November 28, 1986.FPM Letter 792-16 followed both the language of Executive Order 12564 andpre-existing law and regulation. The first section of the Letter discussedits purpose and stated that the use of illegal drugs by Federal employees,whether on or off duty, cannot be tolerated and that the Federal government,as the nation's largest employer, must be in the forefront of the nationaleffort to eliminate illegal drugs from the American workplace.That FPM Letter went on to set forth agency responsibilities in draftingand implementing drug-free Federal workplace plans. Each agency head wasrequired, pursuant to the Executive Order, to develop a plan for achievingthe objective of a drug-free workplace, which contains a policy statement,an Employee Assistance Program, supervisory training, provision for employeeself-referral, and provisions for identifying illegal drug users (includingdrug testing). The head of each agency was also required, pursuant to theExecutive Order, to test employees in sensitive positions for the use ofillegal drugs. The FPM Letter set forth recommendations regarding how agenciesmay carry out their drug testing programs and drug testing procedures ingeneral. In addition, the Letter addressed the Executive Order mandatethat agencies are to maintain statistical records on the number of employeesand applicants tested and the number of confirmed positive test results,while removing personally identifying information from such records. TheLetter also described the role of the Employee Assistance Program in adrug-free workplace program.A sample employee acknowledgement of notice of an agency's drug-free workplaceprogram and a model Employee Assistance Program was attached to FPM Letter792-16.FPM Letter 792-17 was issued on March 9, 1987, as a brief supplement toFPM Letter 792-16. The language contained in FPM Letter 792-17 that amendedFPM Letter 792-16 has been incorporated into the basic text of the portionof FPM Letter 792-19 that was taken from FPM Letter 792-16.FPM Letter 792-18 was issued on December 30, 1988, as a notice to Federalagencies of the need to take action to bring their Drug-Free Workplaceplans into compliance with a soon-to-be-effective provision of the Treasury,Postal, and General Government Appropriations Act or 1989, Public Law No.100-440. The guidance contained therein has been incorporated into theFPM Letter for use by agencies that may be established in the future.FPM Letter 792-19 also corrects typographical errors contained in FPM Letters792-16, 792-17, and 792-18.Provisions that have been rendered obsolete, inappropriate, or ineffective,by either the passage of time, subsequent legislative enactments, or revisedOPM policy, have also been amended or deleted, as appropriate.Finally, provisions of the National Drug Control Strategy issued by thePresident and the National Drug Control Policy Office on September 5, 1989,that set new requirements for Federal agencies in implementing the Drug-FreeFederal Workplace program are incorporated in the final version of FPMLetter 792-19.FPM Letter 792-19 supersedes and replaces FPM Letters 792-16, 792-17, and792-18. Publication of the draft FPM Letter, receipt and considerationof comments, and publication of the final version of the FPM Letter complieswith a court order entered in <T3>NTEU</T3> v. <T3>Reagan,</T3> Civ. No. 86-4058 (E.D. La.).<ITAG tagnum="84">Response to Comments</ITAG>Written comments in response to the Opportunity for Comment published April6, 1989, were received from 10 individuals, organizations and Federal agencies.All written comments were reviewed and taken into consideration in thepreparation of the final FPM Letter. This section summarizes major commentsand the response of the Office of Personnel Management to them. Similarcomments are considered together. Typographical, grammatical, and technicalcorrections have also been made to the publication. In addition, severaltelephone inquiries were made concerning the application of the FPM Letterto employees of Federal contractors. The FPM system sets forth guidancefor the management and supervision of Federal employees, not employeesof Federal contractors.A. General Concerns1. Several commenters, including two employee unions, expressed their generaldisagreement with the policy underlying the drug-testing portion of theDrug-Free Federal Workplace program. One described it as a ``witch hunt.''Another opined that the drug testing program contained too much room forabuse and that it will be used to ruin outspoken employees. Another urgedthe re-examination of the motives behind drug testing. These commenterschallenge the basic policy underlying the inclusion of drug testing asone of the elements of the Drug-Free Federal Workplace program set outin Executive Order 12564. The FPM Letter simply provides guidance to theagencies on the implementation of that policy. Section 6(a)(1) of the ExecutiveOrder required Director of OPM to issue the government-wide guidance embodiedin the FPM Letter. This FPM Letter will be issued in conformity with thatmandate.2. One commenter stated that the FPM Letter goes beyond the scope of theExecutive Order. OPM disagrees and believes that the FPM Letter does notexceed the limits of the Executive Order, except to the extent necessaryto provide agencies with sufficiently detailed guidance to take appropriatepersonnel management actions consistent with Executive Order policies andto meet the requirements of intervening statutory enactments and Presidentialdirectives.3. One commenter, a Federal employee union, asked whether or not the publicationof the FPM Letter in the <T4>Federal Register</T4> was a rulemaking under the terms of 5 U.S.C.553. As noted in the supplementary information accompanying this publication,an FPM Letter is not a formal rule. It is interpretative guidance preparedby OPM to assist agency managers and personnelists in implementation ofa program. While this, then, is not a formal rulemaking, it was publishedin draft form for comment, and those comments have been considered beforepublishing the final version of the FPM Letter, in accordance with thecourt's order in <T3>NTEU</T3> v. Reagan, Civ. No. 86-4058 (E.D. La.).B. Random Testing1. Several commenters objected to the random testing component of the programon constitutional grounds and asserted that it violates the 4th Amendmentto the Constitution. One commenter opposed it on the broader ground thatit invades employee privacy. Another commenter stated that it was prematurefor the government to consider random drug testing of employees given theuncertain constitutionality of the practice and requested reconsiderationor delay of the issuance of the FPM Letter until the question of the constitutionalityof random drug testing was resolved. There have been numerous constitutionalchallenges to the random drug testing portion of the program in Federalcourts across the country. Several of those courts have held that randomdrug testing of certain employees in specific types of sensitive positionsis not a violation of the 4th Amendment to the Constitution (<T3>e.g., National Federation of Federal Employees </T3>v.<T3> Cheney, </T3>No. 88-5080 (D.C. Cir., August 29, 1989; <T3>American Federation of Government Employees </T3>v.<T3> Skinner, </T3>No. 87-5417 (D.C. Cir., September 8, 1989) and othershave held the converse (<T3>e.g., Connelly</T3> v.<T3> Newman</T3>, No. 88-5085 DLJ (N.D. Cal., June 15, 1989); <T3>National Treasury Employees Union </T3>v.<T3> Watkins,</T3> No. 89-1006 JRP (D.D.C., June 16, 1989). Given the factthat the courts have decided the question of the constitutionality of particularagency programs established under the Executive Order in individual legalchallenges, it cannot be said that those agencies with plans that passconstitutional muster should not go forward. The guidance afforded by theFPM Letter provides important assistance to those agencies whose plansare held to be constitutional. For those plans that have not been challenged,three is a presumption of constitutionality, and OPM's guidance will assistthem as well.2. Several commenters challenged the definition of employees in sensitivepositions and the testing designated position (TDP) selection process.One commenter suggested that the definition of an ``employee in a sensitiveposition'' and the criteria for selecting TDPs are grossly overbroad andvague. The definition of ``employee in a sensitive position'' that appearsin the FPM Letter at section 3a(1) is exactly the same as the definitionof that term set out in section 7(d) of Executive Order 12564. OPM believesthat using that definition to determine the group of positions that mightbe subject to random testing and then using the TDP selection process outlinedin section 3a(2)(ii) guides agencies to craft a narrow group of TDPs thatcomprise both those positions falling within the Executive Order definitionof employees in sensitive positions <T3>and,</T3> from that group of positions, identify the positions thathave the <T3>most direct</T3> impact on public health, safety, or national security.Another said that it was ridiculous to target law enforcement positionsfor random testing and that heavy equipment and motor vehicle operatorswere more likely to present safety hazards. The definition of employeesin sensitive positions is not limited to law enforcement positions nordoes it target those positions. Those positions are simply one group ofpositions that may be randomly tested if the agency head determines, throughthe TDP selection process, that they have a direct relation to public health,safety, or national security. In addition, under both the definition ofemployees in sensitive positions and the TDP selection process, heavy equipmentand motor vehicle operators may well be included in an agency's TDPs.Another opined that agency heads must consider the necessity for the randomtesting of employees holding sensitive positions in the agency given thelevel of drug use, the utility of other detection means, and then publishthe basis for their decision to use random testing. In the cases in whichrandom testing has been upheld as constitutional, it has been argued thatboth the level of drug use in the agency and the utility of other detectionmeans should be considered before an agency may properly embark on randomurinalysis. In those cases, the courts have held that establishing a baselineof drug use or examining the utility of alternative detection means werenot prerequisites for drug testing. <T3>See, e.g., National Federation of Federal Employees v. Cheney, </T3>No.88-5080 (D.C. Cir. August 29, 1989). Similarly, OPM does not believe thatagency heads must consider the level of drug use or the utility of alternativedetection means before instituting a drug testing program. While theseare important factors that agency heads will certainly need to consideras they attempt to meet create a Drug-Free Workplace in their agencies,those considerations should not govern whether or not drug testing is begun.On the other hand, agency heads who have established Drug-Free FederalWorkplace plans under Executive Order 12564 have included a discussionof the necessity for random testing their TDPs and the basis for theirselection of those positions for random testing in their plans.Another urged deletion of section 3a(1)(ii) of the FPM Letter because mereaccess to classified information is not sufficient to justify drug testing.This commenter urged that the type of information and the degree of accessshould be examined before designating the position as a TDP. Those factorsare certainly appropriate in determining whether or not to include particularpositions as TDPs. Sufficient latitude is afforded in the definition of``employee in a sensitive position'' set out at section 3a(1)(ii) of theFPM Letter (and section 7(d)(2) of Executive Order 12564) and the TDP selectionprocess outlined at section 3a(2)(ii) of the FPM Letter to allow agencyheads to consider those factors. In addition, as section 3a(1)(ii) of theFPM Letter simply restates, <T3>verbatim, </T3>the definition set out at section 7(d)(2) of the ExecutiveOrder, OPM sees no need to delete it. The same commenter urged the rewritingof section 3a(4) of the FPM Letter to standardize the TDP selection processto ensure non-discriminatory selection. Section 3a(3) of the FPM Letteralready requires the neutral application of the TDP selection process andexpressly urges agencies to ensure that ``the selection process does notresult in arbitrary, capricious, or discriminatory selections.'' Thus,OPM believes that the concerns of this commenter have already been addressed.3. One commenter urged that section 3a, 3a(4), andamp; 3a(5) of the FPM Letterbe amended to return to the characterization of testing contemplated thereunderas ``random'' rather than ``comprehensive.'' The term ``comprehensive''was used in the proposed version of the FPM Letter to accommodate thosefew agencies that decide, due to the nature of their agency mission andthe extremely sensitive nature of the positions held by their TDPs, totest <T3>all </T3>of the employees holding those positions rather than a randomlyselected portion of those TDPs. Comprehensive testing includes random testing.C. Reasonable Suspicion Testing 1. One commenter stated that a reasonable suspicion of illegal drug useshould exist before any testing is undertaken by a Federal agency of itsemployees. While OPM believes that a strong reasonable suspicion testingprogram is an important part of any effective Drug-Free Workplace program,the public safety, health, or national security risk present for employeesholding TDPs is strong enough to warrant suspicionless, random testingof employees holding those positions. Thus, reasonable suspicion will notbe required for all testing.2. One commenter stated that there should be no testing based upon a reasonablesuspicion of illegal drug use. Testing should be based on probable causethat an employee is impaired while on duty. The commenter stated that evenif reasonable suspicion testing is upheld, the definition in the FPM Letterinvites abuse. This commenter believed that it provides that a reasonablyarticulable belief or a pattern of misconduct can be used to punish employeeswithout cause. To the contrary, OPM asserts that testing based upon a reasonablesuspicion of illegal drug use is an accepted practice among many municipalgovernments for testing public employees holding sensitive positions. Probablecause, the standard at criminal law for instituting a search, is not requiredbefore the institution of an administrative search, such as a drug test.The definition used in the FPM Letter was developed through an examinationof the definition of reasonable suspicion for administrative searches approvedby the Federal courts over the years. It has withstood judicial scrutinyin several cases and should not be subject to the strict limitations ofprobable cause because the search at issue is undertaken for administrative,rather than criminal prosecution, purposes.Another commenter urged OPM to amend section 3c of the FPM Letter to limittesting based upon a reasonable suspicion of illegal drug use either toreasonable suspicion of illegal drug use while on duty or reasonable suspicionthat an employee's performance is affected by illegal drug use while onduty. This commenter stated that off duty drug use that doesn't affectjob performance should not be the basis for government action. To the contrary,OPM believes that off duty drug use can be a proper basis for reasonablesuspicion testing. Indeed, there are some positions within the Federalservice, as noted by the Supreme Court in <T3>National Treasury Employees Union v. Von Raab, </T3>109 S. Ct. 1384,1393 (1989), which are incompatible with illegal drug use_on- or off-duty.3. One commenter sought the deletion of section 3c(2)(iv) of the FPM Letterand asserted that agency management should not be required to make a decisionon whether to direct a reasonable suspicion test based on information providedby credible and reliable sources. The commenter questioned that abilityof the management official to make an objective determination of the reliabilityand credibility of a source. Management officials are frequently calledupon to make determinations about the credibility and reliability of thesources of information they receive. They will be required to do no morethan that in determining whether reasonable suspicion of illegal drug useexists. In addition, under the plans developed by the agencies, a writtenrecord will be made of the circumstances leading to a reasonable suspiciondetermination and higher level concurrence will be required before an employeeis directed to take a reasonable suspicion drug test.D. Accident/Unsafe Practice Testing 1. One commenter suggested that section 3d of the FPM Letter on specificcondition testing should be limited to those persons whose actions mayhave contributed to the accident or unsafe practice that is the basis forthe test. The same commenter also suggested that some proof of improperconduct be required before an employee could be subject to testing. Bythe very terms of section 3d of the FPM Letter, specific condition (nowaccident or unsafe practice) testing is triggered by ``an examination authorizedby the agency regarding an accident or unsafe practice.'' OPM believesthat testing directed under those conditions will ensure that only thosepersons involved in the accident or unsafe practice will be tested forillegal drug use. 2. One commenter registered a strong objection to safety reasons for accidentand unsafe practice testing. This commenter noted that shipyards are inherentlyunsafe which would lead to more unwarranted tests because of the more dangerouswork environment. Dangerous work environments are one of the most persuasivereasons for accident and unsafe practice testing. In order to protect Federalworkers, their co-workers, and members of the public from injury and tohelp determine the cause of on-the-job mishaps, OPM believes that accidentand unsafe practice testing is necessary. 3. The same commenter opined that employees who do not use illegal drugswill be more liable for accident or unsafe practice testing because userswould be more likely not to report accidents in order to avoid testing.Reporting accidents is a responsibility that all Federal employees mustmeet. Co-workers and the public suffer if accidents are not reported. Thereare long-standing safety and accident reporting procedures in place toensure timely reporting of accidents in the workplace. The drug testingprogram is unlikely to impede the proper reporting of workplace mishaps.4. One commenter urged the amendment of section 4c of the FPM Letter toprovide that the notice to employees that they are being directed to adrug test based upon an accident or unsafe practice should also includethe circumstances leading to the decision to test. OPM has added a finalsentence to that section of the FPM Letter that adds that provision. Thesame commenter asked that we change the title of section 3d to ``Accident/UnsafePractice'' to avoid confusion with section 4c. OPM has done so. E. Follow-Up Testing During Rehabilitation 1. One commenter suggested that section 3e of the FPM Letter be amendedto add, before the last sentence of that section: ``Positive results obtainedduring counseling or rehabilitation can only be used to support disciplineor an adverse action if the employee, at the time of the test, has beenprovided with a reasonable opportunity to have been rehabilitated.'' Ratherthan make the suggested change in this FPM Letter, OPM will discuss theseissues in a later FPM issuance discussed below in the discussion of commentsentitled L. Rehabilitation Act/Reasonable Accommodation. F. Applicant Testing 1. One commenter stated that there is no justification for testing applicantsfor any positions. This commenter asserted that Background Investigationsare required only for sensitive positions and that non-sensitive positionsshould not be subject to applicant testing. Section 3(d) of Executive Order12564 authorizes agency heads to conduct applicant testing. Section 3fof the FPM Letter restates that authority and provides guidance to agencyheads on how to implement an applicant testing program. As noted in thatsection, agency mission is a factor that agency heads should consider indetermining the scope of applicant testing. 2. Another commenter urged that the third sentence of section 3f(2) asit appeared in FPM Letter 792-16 concerning applicants providing medicalinformation be restored. OPM has restored the provision. 3. The same commenter stated that section 3f(4) of the FPM Letter shouldrequire agencies to deny Federal employment to those applicants who testpositive for illegal drugs. That commenter also urged the inclusion ofadditional standards and guidance if discretion is left to the agencies.Section 1(c) of the Executive Order states that ``[p]ersons who use illegaldrugs are not suitable for Federal employment.'' Given that strongly statedstandard, no additional standards that OPM might devise for inclusion inthe FPM Letter are necessary. As noted previously, this FPM Letter providesguidance to the agencies on how to implement Executive Order 12564 butdoes not state any additional requirements that do not already appear inthat Order or in existing statute or regulation. Thus, no new requirementthat agencies must deny employment to applicants who test positive forillegal drugs will be included in the FPM Letter. G. Testing Procedures 1. Two commenters urged that additional protection should be included inthe FPM Letter against false positives. One of them noted the example ofemployees that work with chemicals that they may inhale and cause theirdrug tests to turn up positive. The HHS Mandatory Guidelines for FederalWorkplace Drug Testing Programs provide the scientific and technical proceduresthat must be followed. Those guidelines require a Medical Review Officer(MRO) to determine the validity of alternative explanations for positivetest results. Those procedures provide the necessary protection for Federalemployees against positive test results that are not due to illegal druguse. 2. One commenter stated that the HHS Mandatory Guidelines for Federal WorkplaceDrug Testing Programs does not allow the employee to provide a new sampleas a defense against erroneous test results. This commenter stated thatthe HHS Guidelines only allow a retest of a portion of the original samplethat could be flawed. This commenter stated that this demonstrated an outrageousindifference to logic, merit principles, and due process. (Another commenteralso noted that the procedure denied employee rights to due process.) Thecommenter stated that allowing the testing of a different sample wouldguarantee the protection of employee rights. The FPM Letter notes thatagencies are required to follow the HHS Mandatory Guidelines for FederalWorkplace Drug Testing Programs when conducting drug testing programs.OPM did not promulgate those guidelines. HHS is responsible for their issuanceand their amendment, if appropriate. OPM supports the position taken inthe HHS Mandatory Guidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programsthat later testing of new samples would undermine the accuracy and validityof the testing process. 3. Another commenter stated that the procedure set out in section 4g(2)of the FPM Letter for providing a specimen under observation is embarrassingand degrading and it should only be done when there is reasonable evidencethat an employee will alter or tamper with the test sample. The HHS MandatoryGuidelines for Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs and the FPM Lettermake it clear that direct observation will occur only if there is reasonto believe that an employee or applicant may alter or substitute the specimen.The FPM Letter also includes a list of examples of circumstances that maylead to that reason to believe that the employee or applicant may alteror substitute the specimen. OPM believes that the HHS Mandatory Guidelinesfor Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs require a reasonable basisfor direct observation and that the FPM Letter has incorporated those requirements.4. Another commenter urged the use of the term ``verified positive testresult'' rather than ``confirmed positive test result'' throughout theFPM Letter in order to avoid confusion with the HHS Mandatory Guidelinesfor Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs. OPM has made the necessarychanges. H. Notices to Employees 1. One commenter urged that the FPM Letter include a requirement that,as a part of the process whereby notice of drug testing is given to employees,each agency must turn over the names of all bargaining unit employees holdingTDPs to the union that represents them. Although this is a procedural issuethat could arise, the interpretation and application of 5 U.S.C. 7114(b)(4),which addresses an agency's obligation to provide information to an exlusiverepresentative, are outside the purview of this guidance. Consequently,this issue will not be addressed here. I. Compliance With HHS Mandatory Guidelines 1. Two commenters noted that section 4e of the FPM Letter should be amendedto note that adoption and compliance with the HHS Mandatory Guidelinesfor Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs is mandatory, not permissive.OPM has made the necessary change to note that agency compliance with thoseguidelines is mandatory. J. Confidentiality/Recordkeeping/Patient Records and Test Results 1. One commenter urged that section 4f(1) of the FPM Letter be amendedto reflect the requirement of 42 U.S.C. 290ee-3, to-wit: ``(1) Recordsof the identity * * * drug abuse prevention program conducted, regulated,or directly or indirectly assisted by a Federal agency must be kept confidential* * *.'' OPM has made the necessary amendments to that section. 2. The same commenter urged that section 4f of the FPM Letter be amendedto clarify the restrictions on the release of drug test results to thirdparty adjudicators. OPM believes that there is no need to do anything furtherthan restate the limitations on release of drug test results as they appearedin section 503 of the Supplemental Appropriations Act of 1987. That hasbeen done.3. The same commenter urged the amendment of the third line of section4f(2)(ii) of the FPM Letter to add ``patient'' before ``identifying.''OPM has made the suggested change. 4. The same commenter suggested the amendment of the second sentence ofsection 4f(6) of the FPM Letter to add ``prior written'' before ``employeeconsent'' and replace ``empowered to recommend or take action'' with ``havingauthority to take adverse personnel action against such employee.'' Thesecond change should also be made in section 4f(7). OPM has made the suggestedchanges. 5. The same commenter suggested the deletion of section 4g of the FPM Letterto diminish any confusion that might be caused by paraphrasing the HHSMandatory Guidelines on Federal Workplace Drug Testing Progams. OPM believesthat no confusion exists between section 4g of the FPM Letter and the HHSMandatory Guidelines on Federal Workplace Drug Testing Programs and believesthat it is important to reiterate the protections included in them in theFPM Letter.  6. The same commenter noted that 42 CFR 2.32 requires written consent beobtained with a prescribed written statement and that the sample set outin Attachment 3 to the FPM Letter does not follow it. The commenter alsosuggested that the following be added to the sample consent form: ``TheFederal rules restrict any use of the information to criminally investigateor prosecute any alcohol or drug abuse patient.'' That provision has beenadded to the sample consent form.7. The same commenter suggested that section 11 of Attachment 6 to theFPM Letter be changed from ``Confidentiality of Client Records'' to ``Confidentialityof Alcohol and Drug Abuse Patient Records.'' Section 11 has been changedas suggested.K. Discipline1. One commenter objected to using a voluntary admission of a drug problemas a finding of illegal drug use and removal for the second offense asthey violate nexus and reasonable accommodation requirements. OPM doesnot believe that either of the challenged provisions violate those requirements.Neither of the provisions eliminates the need for a nexus between adverseactions taken against employees for misconduct and the efficiency of theservice. That requirement is statutory in nature and is not affected bythis FPM Letter. A voluntary admission of illegal drug use is simply onetype of evidence that an employee uses illegal drugs. Executive Order 12564requires the <T3>initiation</T3> of removal action for a second verified positive testresult. Nexus must still be established in order for an adverse actionbased on misconduct to be sustained on appeal. Similarly, neither provisionrestricts the requirement that agencies must, in appropriate cases, providereasonable accommodation of an employee's handicap.2. Another commenter stated section 4d of the FPM Letter should state astrong policy in favor of agencies at least initiating action against employeeswho refuse testing. The provision has been changed to urge agencies toat least initiate action under those circumstances.3. The same commenter suggested that section 5b of the FPM Letter be changedto ``Mandatory Initiation of Removal Action.'' This change has been made.4. The same commenter stated that section 5d of the FPM Letter should bedeleted as it is not useful to list the available disciplinary actions.OPM believes that it is helpful to list the types of actions that may betaken based upon illegal drug use by an employee.L. Rehabilitation Act/Reasonable Accommodation1. Two commenters recommended that OPM take this opportunity to reviseand clarify procedural guidance with regard to the agency obligation toaccommodate employees identified as drug addicts and alcoholics. They urgedinstitution of a flexible reasonable accommodation policy based on riskassessment. OPM is in the process of developing new guidance on the issueof reasonable accommodation. That new guidance will address the concernsexpressed by these commenters.M. Employee Assistance Programs1. One commenter stated that some of the EAP consortia listed by city inthe appendix to the FPM Letter are region-wide and that it would be morehelpful to list them by region. OPM has prepared an updated listing ofEAP consortia and has substituted it for the list set out in the proposedversion of this FPM Letter.2. The same commenter urged OPM not to use the names of the treatment providers,but to use titles and phone numbers and provide an updated list. The newlist has been substituted for the one that appeared previously.<ITAG tagnum="84">Provisions From The National Drug Control Strategy</ITAG>On September 5, 1989, President Bush transmitted the 1989 National DrugControl Strategy to Congress. That strategy was prepared by the Officeof National Drug Control Policy and transmitted to the Congress in accordancewith section 1005 of the Anti-Drug Abuse Act of 1988 (21 U.S.C. 1504).The National Strategy contained two provisions directing that Federal agenciestake certain action toward implementation of Executive Order 12564. Onpage 104 in Appendix B of the National Strategy, the agencies are givena schedule for implementation and guidance on reviewing their testing designatedpositions as the courts rule on legal challenges to the program. Thosedirectives have been incorporated into new sections of the FPM Letter atsection 2d and section 3a(6), respectively.<ITAG tagnum="21">U.S. Office of Personnel Management.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">Constance Berry Newman,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Director.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">FPM Letter 792-19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Office of Personnel Management</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">Federal Personnel Manual System</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">FPM Letter 792-19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Published in advance of incorporation in FPM Supplement 792-2; RETAINUNTIL SUPERSEDED)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16"/><T4>SUBJECT:</T4> Establishing a Drug-Free Federal Workplace<ITAG tagnum="44">Washington, DC 20415.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="16">Heads of Departments and Independent Establishments:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="81">1. PURPOSE</ITAG>a. The use of illegal drugs by a significant proportion of the nationalworkforce has major adverse effects on the welfare of all Americans, andresults in billions of dollars of lost productivity each year. There isno reason to believe that there is a greater incidence of illegal druguse in the Federal workforce than in the private workforce. However, asthe Nation's largest employer, the Federal government and its two millioncivilian employees must be in the forefront of our national effort to eliminateillegal drugs from the American workplace.b. The use of illegal drugs by Federal employees, whether on or off thejob, cannot be tolerated. Employees who use illegal drugs have three tofour times more accidents while at work. Federal workers have a right toa safe and secure workplace, and all American citizens, who daily dependon the work of the Federal government for their health, safety, and security,have a right to a reliable and productive civil service. Federal agenciesmust take action for the protection of individual drug users, their co=workers,and the society at large. In recognition of this, President Reagan, inExecutive Order 12564, set forth the policy of the United States Governmentto eliminate drug use from the Federal workplace.c. Agencies will establish a comprehensive drug prevention program whichis humane, responsible, and effective. In recognition that employees whouse drugs are, themselves, primarily responsible for changing their behavior,the program will include drug education and training, employee counselingand assistance, and voluntary drug testing. However, where appropriate,there will be mandatory drug testing and disciplinary action.d. This will be a balanced program which emphasizes offering a helpinghand to employees who are using illegal drugs. At the same time, it mustbe clear to all that continued illegal drug use by employees will not betolerated and may result in disciplinary action up to and including removal.e. Under the Executive Order, OPM is directed to issue government-wideguidance to agencies on the implementation of the terms of the Order.<ITAG tagnum="81">2. AGENCY RESPONSIBILITIES</ITAG>a. The head of each Executive agency shall develop a plan for achievingthe objective of a drug-free workplace with due consideration of the rightsof the government, and the employee. Agencies should make every reasonableeffort to ensure workforce understanding of, and employee organizationcooperation with, their drug prevention programs. Communications shouldemphasize the importance of the drug prevention program for agency missionand the community at large. Further, agencies should ensure that theirdrug prevention programs complement agency programs to deal with alcoholabuse and related employee problems.b. Each agency plan shall include:(1) A statement of policy setting forth the agency's expectations regardingdrug use and the action to be anticipated in response to identified druguse;(2) Employee Assistance Programs (EAP's) with high level direction, emphasizingeducation, counseling, referral to rehabilitation, and coordination withavailable community resources;(3) Supervisory training to assist in identifying and addressing illegaldrug use by agency employees (agencies may wish to include material onalcohol abuse in this training);(4) Provision for self-referral as well as supervisory referrals to counselingor rehabilitation with maximum respect for individual confidentiality consistentwith safety and security requirements; and (5) Provision for identifying illegal drug users, including testing ona controlled and carefully monitored basis in accordance with E.O. 12564and the guidance contained below.c. Agencies should consult with the Attorney General regarding their drugtesting programs, as provided by Section 6(b) of the Order.d. Each Federal agency will expedite the implementation of a Drug-FreeWorkplace plan. Those agencies with certified plans will fully implementthem, consistent with the holdings in recent court decisions, by January5, 1990, as required in the National Drug Control Strategy. This implementationis to include Employee Assistance Programs or other appropriate mechanisms,training for supervisors, rehabilitation for drug users, and drug testing.Agencies without currently certified plans will complete certificationby January 5, 1990, and fully implement the plans by April 5, 1990.<ITAG tagnum="81">3. AGENCY DRUG TESTING PROGRAMS</ITAG>a. Comprehensive Testing for Employees in Sensitive Positions. In accordancewith section 3(a) of Executive Order 12564, the head of each Executiveagency shall establish a program to test for the use of illegal drugs byemployees in sensitive positions.(1) For purposes of this program, the term ``employee(s) in a sensitiveposition'' refers to:i. An employee in a position that an agency head designates Special Sensitive,Critical-Sensitive, or Noncritical-Sensitive under Chapter 731 of the FederalPersonnel Manual or an employee in a position that an agency head designatesas sensitive in accordance with Executive Order No. 10450, as amended;ii. An employee who has been granted access to classified information ormay be granted access to classified information pursuant to a determinationof trustworthiness by an agency head under Section 4 of Executive OrderNo. 12356;iii. Individuals serving under Presidential appointments;iv. Law enforcement officers as defined in 5 U.S.C. andSection; 8321(20);andv. Other positions that the agency head determines involve law enforcement,national security, the protection of life and property, public health orsafety, or other functions requiring a high degree of trust and confidence.(2) The head of each agency has discretion to determine which sensitivepositions for which comprehensive testing is authorized ought to be subjectto such testing. This determination should be based on the nature of theagency's mission, its employees' duties, the efficient use of agency resources,and the danger that could result from the failure of an employee to dischargehis or her duties adequately. Thus, who will actually be tested is a functionof a two step analysis by the agency head.i. First, the criteria set forth in Section 7(d) of Executive Order 12564must be applied to all employees in the agency to determine which employeesfall into the ``pool'' of employees potentially subject to drug testing;this is the pool of ``employees in sensitive positions'' as defined inthe Executive Order. While the definition of the pool of ``employees insensitive positions'' is the same from agency to agency, the testing ofall employees in that pool may be appropriate for some agencies and notfor others depending upon the duties of the positions and the missionsof the agencies. If an agency head decides not to test all employees inthe pool, then a further determination must be made as outlined below.ii. Second, a determination must then be made from this pool as to whichpositions will actually be tested. For the sake of clarity within thisguidance, this second group of positions is referred to as Testing DesignatedPositions (TDPs). Thus, an agency head may determine not to designate allsensitive positions as TDPs, but may limit testing to certain positions.For instance, this may include positions where national security considerationsare present, as well as positions where there is a clear impact on publichealth or safety (e.g., air traffic controllers; operators of motor vehicles;medical, nursing, and related health care personnel) or positions relatingto illegal drug control (e.g., law enforcement officers such as customsagents and drug enforcement agents). Other positions should be reviewedwith particular care when one or more of the following are present as regular,recurring duties: operation or maintenance of any transportation, motorvehicle, aircraft, or heavy or other large mechanical or electrical equipment;work with explosive, toxic, radioactive, or other dangerous materials;work with fluids or gases under heat or pressure; work by employees uniquelypositioned to exploit highly sensitive computer or financial data for financialgain.(3) When selecting TDPs, agencies should ensure that the selection processdoes not result in arbitrary, capricious, or discriminatory selections.Agencies must be able to justify their selection of TDPs as a neutral applicationof the selection criteria set forth in section 3(a)(2)(ii), above. Agenciesare absolutely prohibited from selecting positions for drug testing onthe basis of a desire to test particular individual employees.(4) Individuals in TDPs may be selected for comprehensive testing in avariety of ways. For example, their names or social security numbers maybe selected randomly by computer, they may be selected according to theirbirth dates, or they may be selected by the first letter in their surnames.(5) Comprehensive testing may include unscheduled testing and random samplingof the employees within the group of TDPs. As an alternative to this methodof selection, the head of an agency may, at his or her discretion, designatethat all employees in TDPs shall be tested.(6) In carrying out their responsibilities under Section 3 of ExecutiveOrder 12564, agency heads should review their testing designated positionsperiodically as significant new decisions on drug testing are issued bythe courts.b. Voluntary Testing. The head of each Executive agency shall establisha program for voluntary employee drug testing that allows employees tovolunteer to participate in the drug testing program. An agency shouldafford an opportunity for any employee to step forward and be tested ata time determined appropriate by the agency.c. Reasonable Suspicion Testing. In addition to the testing outlined insubsections (a) and (b) of this section, the head of each Executive agencyis authorized to test an employee when there is a reasonable suspicionthat any employee uses illegal drugs. For the purposes of this program``reasonable suspicion'' is an articulable belief that an employee usesillegal drugs drawn from specific and particularized facts and reasonableinferences from those facts.(1) Prompt supervisory training to assist in identifying and addressingillegal drug use by agency employees should be provided to supervisorsas each agency develops and implements its agency program. Such trainingwill make supervisors more sensitive to employee behavior and help supervisorsrecognize those facts that give rise to a reasonable suspicion.(2) ``Reasonable suspicion'' that an employee uses illegal drugs may bebased upon, among other things:i. observable phenomena, such as direct observation of drug use and/orthe physical symptoms of being under the influences of a drug;ii. a pattern of abnormal conduct or erratic behavior;iii. arrest or conviction for a drug related offense; or the identificationof an employee as the focus of a criminal investigation into illegal drugpossession, use, or trafficking;iv. information provided either by reliable and credible sources or independentlycorroborated; orv. newly discovered evidence that the employee has tampered with a previousdrug test.(3) Where testing is conducted based on reasonable suspicion, each agencyshould promptly detail in writing the circumstances which formed the basisof its determination that reasonable suspicion exists to warrant the testing.Such documentation should be retained in the adverse action file compiledby the agency.d. Accident/Unsafe Practice Testing. The head of each agency is also authorizedto test an employee for illegal drug use in an examination authorized bythe agency regarding an accident or unsafe practice.e. Follow-up Testing. The head of each agency may also require agency-administeredfollow-up drug testing during or after counseling or rehabilitation forillegal drug use through an Employee Assistance Program. While follow uptesting may be undertaken as a part of counseling or rehabilitation underthe Employee Assistance Program, only the results of agency-administeredfollow-up testing may be used, if verified positive results are obtained,to support an adverse action taken under section 5(d)(2) of the ExecutiveOrder. To insure its integrity, such agency-administered follow-up testingought to be unannounced.f. Applicant Testing. The head of each Executive agency is authorized,but not required, to test any applicant for illegal drug use. Agency headswho choose to test applicants for illegal drug use have a variety of options.For example, depending on the mission of the agency, an agency may wishto test all applicants for employment. On the other hand, an agency maydetermine that it will limit applicant testing to applicants for TDPs.Where an applicant must submit to a physical examination as a conditionof employment, an agency may wish to require a drug test as part of thephysical examination procedures.(1) Agencies should include notice of drug testing on vacancy announcementsfor those positions where drug testing is required. A sample notice provisionfor vacancy announcements or other information about the position wouldread as follows: ``All applicants for this position will be required tosubmit to a urinalysis for illegal drug use prior to appointment in theFederal service.''(2) Where applicants are given preemployment physical examinations, drugtesting may be performed as part of the physical examination procedures.Where no physical examinations are required, applicants should be contactedand directed to report to a designated contractor or agency facility fortheir drug test. Before a drug test is conducted, all applicants may beadvised of the opportunity to submit medical documentation that may supporta legitimate use of a specific drug. Aside from the general notice of thedrug-testing requirement in vacancy announcements, applicants should receiveas little notice as possible of the actual date and time of their drugtest. A urine specimen should be taken no more than forty-eight hours afterthe applicant is contacted to set up the drug testing.(3) In remote locations, applicants should be directed to report to thenearest contractor or agency facility. Agencies ought to provide for reimbursementto applicants for reasonable expenses incurred in travel to the drug testingfacility. In extremely remote areas, the contractor may be required totravel periodically to the region to perform drug-testing of applicants.(4) All applicants with verified positive test results should be refusedemployment.g. Hardship Exemption. Agencies may choose to exempt certain positionsfrom the drug testing program on the basis of hardship due to the remotelocation of the duty station of the positions, the unavailability of on-sitetesting personnel, or the lack of an appropriate site for test administration.Agencies should, however, use reasonable means to overcome such hardships.<ITAG tagnum="81">4. DRUG TESTING PROCEDURES</ITAG>a. 60 Day General Notice to All Employees.(1) Agencies which have not yet implemented a drug testing program shallensure that at least sixty days elapse between a general one-time noticeto all employees that a drug testing program is being implemented and thebeginning of actual drug testing. Such notice should indicate the purposeof the drug testing program, the availability of counseling and rehabilitationassistance through the agency's Employee Assistance Program, when testingwill commence, the general categories of employees to be tested, and thegeneral parameters of testing. Agencies may decide to include with theirnotice a description of their drug program or a copy of the internal personnelrules establishing their program.(2) Any agency may take action as described in parts 3c and 3d. of thisletter without reference to the 60 day notice requirement.b. Special Notice to Covered Employees. Agencies should ensure a specificnotice is given, in writing, to each employee in a TDP no later than thirtydays before testing commences. We recommend that agencies obtain a writtenacknowledgment of receipt of the notice. A sample acknowledgment for agencyconsideration is provided as attachment 1 to this letter. The notice shouldcontain the following information:(1) The reasons for the urinalysis test, consistent with agency policyformulated in accordance with sections 1 and 3a. of this letter.(2) Notice of the oppportunity for an employee to identify himself voluntarilyas a user of illegal drugs willing to undertake counseling and, as necessary,rehabilitation, in which case disciplinary action is not required.(3) Assurance that the quality of testing procedures is tightly controlled,that the test used to confirm use of illegal drugs is highly reliable,and that test results will be handled with maximum respect for individualconfidentiality, consistent with safety and security.(4) Notice of the opportunity and procedures for submitting supplementalmedical documentation that may support a legitimate use for a specificdrug.(5) The circumstances under which testing may occur, consistent with thepolicy set forth in section 3 of this letter.(6) The consequences of a verified positive result or refusal to be tested,including disciplinary action.(7) The availability of drug abuse counseling and referral services, includingthe name and telephone number of the local Employee Assistance Programcounselor.c. Notice to Employees Tested Under Specific Conditions. Employees beingtested under conditions outlined in section 3c, 3d, and 3e will receivenotice that includes information contained in section 4b., paragraphs (1),(3), (4), (6), and (7). Employees being tested under conditions outlinedin section 3c will also receive notice of the circumstances leading tothe decision to test them for illegal drug use.d. Agency Response to Persons Refusing to Participate in a Required DrugTest.(1) To maintain the integrity of the testing and enforcement program, agenciesshould initiate disciplinary action for employees who refuse to be tested.Such action may include, but is not necessarily limited to, removal ofsuch employees as failing to meet a condition of employment and/or refusingto comply with the requirements of the agency's drug-free workplace program.(2) Applicants who are not current employees and who refuse to be testedmust be refused that employment.e. Technical Guidelines for Drug Testing. The Secretary of Health and HumanServices, as directed by Executive Order No. 12564, issued Mandatory Scientificand Technical Guidelines for Federal Employee Drug Testing Programs. 53FR 11970, April 11, 1988. Agencies must conduct their drug testing programsin accordance with those scientific and technical guidelines.f. Confidentiality of EAP Treatment Records and Drug Test Results. Agencydrug testing programs under E.O. 12564 shall contain procedures to protectthe confidentiality of 1) medical and rehabilitation records and 2) drugtest results. These two classes of information are contained in differentsystems of records and are subject to different confidentiality requirements.However, both EAP treatment records and drug test results may be utilizedin the program. Thus, both are discussed below. (1) Records of the identity, diagnosis, prognosis, or treatment of anypatient which are maintained in connection with performance of a drug abuseprevention program conducted, regulated, or indirectly assisted by a Federalagency must be kept confidential and may be disclosed only under limitedcircumstances and for specific purposes. Agencies may wish to refer toregulations issued by the Department of Health and Human Services (42 C.F.R.2. 1, et seq. (1987)) on maintaining the confidentiality of treatment records.(2) Drug abuse treatment records may be disclosed without the consent ofthe patient only:i. to medical personnel to the extent necessary to meet a genuine medicalemergency; ii. to qualified personnel for conducting scientific research, managementaudits, financial audits, or program evaluation, with all patient identifyinginformation removed from the data; or iii. if authorized by an appropriate court order granted after applicationshowing good cause. (3) Any other disclosure may be made only with the written consent of thepatient, and only under circumstances set out below. Such consensual disclosuremay be made to the patient's employer for verification of treatment ora general evaluation of treatment progress. (4) Agency drug testing programs should include confidentiality protectionsconsistent with the above requirements. These protections should extendto drug testing results made a part of treatment and rehabilitation records.(5) Accordingly, drug abuse treatment or rehabilitation records may notbe otherwise disclosed by agencies without the consent of the employeeinvolved. A sample consent for release of patient information during andafter treatment or rehabilitation and a sample release memorandum are includedin attachments 2 and 3, respectively. Any disclosure without such consentis strictly prohibited. (6) As noted above, agencies will also obtain confirmed positive drug testresults that are not part of treatment and rehabilitation records. As partof the drug testing procedure and in conformity with section 503 of theSupplemental Appropriations Act of 1987, Pub. L. 100-71, confirmed positivetest results may only be released without prior written employee consentto the agency's medical review official (as defined in the HHS MandatoryScientific and Technical Guidelines for Federal Employee Drug Testing Programs),the administrator of the agency Employee Assistance Program (EAP), to themanagement official(s) having authority to take adverse personnel actionagainst such employee and pursuant to the order of a court of componentjurisdiction where required by the United States Government to defend againstany challenge against any adverse personnel action. (7) Under the HHS Mandatory Scientific and Technical Guidelines for FederalEmployee Drug Testing, after examination and verification by the medicalreview official, confirmed positive test results will be forwarded to theEAP program administrator and to the management official(s) having authorityto take adverse personnel action against such employee. Drug test resultsshould be protected under the provisions of the Privacy Act, 5 U.S.C. 552a,et seq., and should not be released in violation of that Act. g. Privacy in Drug Testing. Agency drug testing procedures under E.O. 12564must allow individual privacy unless the agency has reason to believe thata particular individual may alter or substitute the specimen to be provided.Agencies should refer to the HHS Mandatory Scientific and Technical Guidelinesfor Federal Employee Drug Testing Programs for the specific proceduresto be followed in conducting drug tests. (1) The sample shall be provided in a rest room stall or similar enclosureso that the employee is not being viewed while providing the sample. However,this requirement does not restrict the ability of the employer to controlthe test area and to take other actions to ensure that the employee doesnot substitute or tamper with the sample. For example, the employer may:(a) control the test area to ensure that samples have not been hidden forsubstitution; (b) prohibit the carrying of bags, luggage, briefcases, orother containers into the test area; (c) prohibit the wearing of coatsand/or jackets in the test area; (d) station a testing official in therest room outside the stall where visual observation is not possible, butwhere the official can monitor the setting for tampering; (e) examine thesample after it is provided for abnormalities in color, temperature, orother evidence that tampering may have occurred. Agencies should referto the HHS Mandatory Scientific and Technical Guidelines for Federal EmployeeDrug Testing Programs for more specific information on sample collection.(2) Generally, an employee or applicant may be required to provide a sampleunder observation only if there is reason to believe that the employeeor applicant may alter or substitute the urine specimen. For example, employersmay wish to require observation when facts and circumstances suggest thatthe person to be tested: (a) is an illegal drug user; (b) is under theinfluence of drugs at the time of the test; (c) has previously been confirmedby the agency to be an illegal drug user; (d) is seen to have equipmentor implements used to tamper with urine samples; (e) has recently beendetermined to have tampered with a sample. <ITAG tagnum="81">5. AGENCY ACTION UPON FINDING THAT AN EMPLOYEE USES ILLEGAL DRUGS</ITAG>a. Drug Use Determination. The determination that an employee has usedillegal drugs may be made on the basis of direct observation, a criminalconviction, verified positive results of the agency's drug testing program,the employee's own admission, or other appropriate determinations. b. Mandatory Initiation of Removal from Sensitive Positions. While removalof an employee confirmed to have used illegal drugs is authorized underthe Executive Order, initiation of an action to remove the employee fromthe Federal service is required after a second determination that the employeeuses illegal drugs. Sections 5(b) and 5(d), respectively, of ExecutiveOrder 12564. If occupying a sensitive position, the employee must not beallowed to remain on duty status in that position. Section 5(c) of ExecutiveOrder 12564. Removal of an employee occupying a sensitive position whois determined to use illegal drugs may be necessary if there are no non-sensitivepositions to which the employee may be transferred in the agency, unlessthe agency head determines that maintaining the employee in the sensitiveposition would not pose a danger to public health or safety or the nationalsecurity.c. Mandatory EAP Referral. Upon reaching a finding that an employee usesillegal drugs, agencies will refer the employee to an Employee AssistanceProgram and give the employee an opportunity to undertake counseling andrehabilitation activities. Section 5(a) of Executive Order 12564. Whileagencies should provide reasonable support and assistance to employeeswho demonstrate a desire to become drug-free, the ultimate responsibilityto be drug-free rests with the individual employee.d. Discretionary Disciplinary Actions. Upon the first confirmed determinationthat an employee uses illegal drugs, there is a range of disciplinary actionsavailable to an agency, from a written reprimand to removal. Except foremployees who voluntarily identify themselves as users of illegal drugs,obtain appropriate counseling and rehabilitation, and thereafter refrainfrom illegal drug use, agencies are required to initiate some form of disciplinaryaction against employees who are found to use illegal drugs. Section 5(b)of Executive Order 12564. Agencies have discretion in deciding what disciplinarymeasures to initiate, consistent with the requirements of the Civil ServiceReform Act and other appropriate factors. Among the disciplinary measuresavailable to agencies are the following:(1) Reprimanding the employee in writing.(2) Placing the employee in an enforced leave status, consistent with theprocedural requirements of 5 C.F.R. andSection;andSection; 752.203 or 752.404as appropriate.(3) Suspending the employee for fourteen days or less consistent with theprocedural requirements in 5 C.F.R. andSection; 752.203.(4) Suspending the employee for 15 days or more consistent with the proceduralrequirements in 5 C.F.R. andSection; 752.404.(5) Suspending the employee, consistent with the procedural requirementsin 5 C.F.R. andSection; 752.404, until such time as he or she successfullycompletes counseling or rehabilitation or until the agency determines thataction other than suspension is more appropriate to the individual situation.(6) Reducing the employee in grade consistent with the procedural requirementsin 5 C.F.R. andSection; 752.404.(7) Removing the employee from Federal service, consistent with the proceduralrequirements of 5 C.F.R. andSection; 752.404, for: verified illicit use ofan illegal drug; refusal to take a drug test authorized by E.O. 12564;refusal to obtain or successfully complete counseling or rehabilitationas required by the Executive Order; or once having completed counselingor rehabilitation, failing to refrain from illegal drug use.(8) Initiating action to remove the employee from Federal service is mandatoryupon a second verified finding of illegal drug use. Section 5(c) of ExecutiveOrder 12564.e. Preponderance of Evidence Requirement. Agencies are reminded that anyaction, including removal, taken against an employee under title 5 UnitedStates Code, Chapter 75, must be supported by a preponderance of the evidence.Care should be taken in the conduct of tests and the handling of testingsamples to ensure that requirements of evidentiary proof may be met.<ITAG tagnum="81">6. STATISTICAL REPORTING</ITAG>Agencies shall keep statistical records on: (1) the number of employeestested and the number of employees with verified positive tests; and (2)the number of applicants tested and the number of applicants with verifiedpositive tests. Personally identifying information in these statisticalrecords is strictly prohibited. The HHS Mandatory Scientific and TechnicalGuidelines for Federal Employee Drug Testing Programs contain additionalrequirements for statistical reporting.<ITAG tagnum="81">7. EMPLOYEE COUNSELING AND ASSISTANCE</ITAG>a. Program Requirement. Federal agencies are required by Public Law 92-255,as amended; Public Law 99-570; and by 5 C.F.R. Part 792 to establish programsfor appropriate prevention, treatment and rehabilitation of Federal civilianemployees with drug abuse problems. Agencies are authorized to establishEmployee Assistance Programs to meet this mandate.b. EAP Requirement. Executive Order 12564 identifies Employee AssistancePrograms as an essential element to an agency's plan to achieve a drug-freeworkforce, and explicitly states that agencies shall refer all employeesfound to be using illegal drugs to their Employee Assistance Program forassessment counseling, and referral for treatment or rehabilitation asappropriate.c. EAP Role. Employee Assistance Programs play an important role in identifyingand resolving employee substance abuse by: demonstrating the agency's commitmentto eliminating illegal drug use; providing employees an opportunity, withappropriate assistance, to discontinue their drug use; providing educationalmaterials to managers, supervisors and employees on drug abuse issues;assisting supervisors in confronting employees who have performance and/orconduct problems which may be based, in whole or in part, on substanceabuse; assessing employee-client problems and making referrals to appropriatetreatment and rehabilitation facilities; and following up with individualsduring the rehabilitation period to track their progress and encouragesuccessful completion of the program.d. EAP Elements. In keeping with Executive Order 12564, agencies shouldensure that:(1) EAP's are available to all employees, including those located outsideof the Washington metropolitan area and major regional cities. Agenciesare encouraged to explore a variety of means for meeting this requirement,including private contractors and cooperative arrangements with other Federalagencies, State and local governments, and non-profit organizations.(2) At sites where it is not feasible to establish a continuing EAP, agenciesshould arrange for employee access on a ``needs'' basis to comparable localresources or, through travel or private telephone calls, to services ofestablished EAP's in other locations.(3) EAP's, whether in-house or operated through contract, are adequatelystaffed with fully qualified individuals who can:i. Provide counseling and assistance to employees who self-refer for treatmentor whose drug tests have been verified positive, and monitor the employees'progress through treatment and rehabilitation;ii. Provide needed education and training to all levels of the organizationon types and effects of drugs, symptoms of drug use and its impact on performanceand conduct, relationship of the employee assistance program with the drugtesting program, and related treatment, rehabilitation, and confidentialityissues;iii. Ensure that the confidentiality of test results and related medicaland rehabilitation records are maintained in accordance with the specificrequirements contained in Public Laws 92-255 and 93-282, with regulationspublished in 42 C.F.R., part 2, and with guidance contained in section4 of this letter.(4) Adequate treatment resources have been identified in the communityin order to facilitate referral of drug abuse clients.(5) All employees in the agency are informed about the EAP and its services.(6) The Employee Assistance Program plays an appropriate role in the developmentand implementation of the agency's Drug-Free Workplace program. EAP's shouldnot be involved in the collection of urine samples or the initial reportingof the results of drug tests, but rather be a critical component in theagency's efforts to counsel and rehabilitate drug-abusing employees, aswell as in educating the workforce on drug abuse and its symptoms.e. Further EAP Assistance.(1) Attachment 4 provides a list of consortia throughout the United States.Agencies wishing to join an existing consortium should contact the individuallisted regarding that possibility.(2) Attachment 5 provides the names and addresses of agencies and organizationswhich can be contacted regarding treatment facilities and education materialsthroughout the U.S.(3) The Model Employee Assistance Program provided as attachment 6 addressesthose functions OPM considers essential for an EAP to provide in supportof the President's drug-free workplace initiative. The model is intendedto be of use to agencies in developing new EAP's and in assessing the adequacyof existing programs. OPM's Employee Health Services Branch (Tel. (FTS/202)632-5558) is available for technical assistance on these provisions.<ITAG tagnum="81">8. COMPLIANCE WITH SECTION 628 OF THE TREASURY, POSTAL, AND GENERALGOVERNMENT APPROPRIATIONS ACT OF 1989</ITAG>a. Background Information. On September 22, 1988, President Reagan signedinto law the Treasury, Postal, and General Government Appropriations Actof 1989, Public Law No. 100-440. Section 628 sets forth drug-free workplacerequirements for Federal departments, agencies, and instrumentalities.Section 8131(c) of the Defense Appropriations Act (Pub. L. No. 100-463),which was signed into law on October 1, 1988, extended the effective dateof section 628 until January 16, 1989.b. Basic provision. Section 628 provides that:No department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States receivingappropriated funds under this Act for fiscal year 1989, or under any otherAct appropriating funds for fiscal year 1989, shall obligate or expendsuch funds unless such department, agency, or instrumentality has in place,and will continue to administer in good faith, a written policy designedto ensure that all of its workplaces are free from the illegal use, possession,or distribution of controlled substances (as defined in the ControlledSubstances Act), by the officers and employees of such department, agency,or instrumentality.c. Relationship to Executive Order 12564. Executive Order (E.O.) 12564,dated September 15, 1986, required agencies to adopt drug-free workplaceplans prohibiting the ``use'' of controlled substances contained in SchedulesI and II, as defined in 21 U.S.C. 802(6) and listed in part B, subchapter13 of that title. In order to comply with section 628, agencies may modifytheir drug-free workplace plans to cover (i) ``possession, or distribution,''in addition to ``use,'' and (ii) controlled substances contained in SchedulesIII through V, in addition to Schedules I and II.d. Limitation. The inclusion of all controlled substances among the scopeof drugs covered under a drug-free workplace plan does not license agenciesto test for drugs other than Schedules I and II controlled substances nowauthorized (such as marijuana, opiates, cocaine, phencyclidine, and amphetamines).e. Agency Responsibilities:(1) Agencies which were covered by section 628 are required to comply withits provisions by January 16, 1989. All agencies which are covered by E.O.12564 are included within the scope of section 628; however, the scopeof section 628 is broader than E.O. 12564. If agency personnel are notsure whether or not an agency is covered by section 628, they should consultwith their agency General Counsel.(2) If an agency or instrumentality is in the Executive Branch, and isnot covered by E.O. 12564, but it is now required to produce and administera written policy to satisfy the provisions of section 628, the agency orinstrumentality may wish to develop its policy in conformity with E.O.12564, the Department of Health and Human Services (HHS) Mandatory Scientificand Technical Guidelines for Federal Employee Drug Testing Programs, andthis FPM Letter. Although an agency is not required by section 628 to followthe above mentioned guidelines and the Executive Order, it is recommendedthat agencies do so in order to help their written policies be legallysustained.(3) Agencies which wish to implement section 628 by amending their existingdrug-free workplace plans may do so by adopting the appendix to this FPMLetter as an appendix to their plan. Agencies are not required to submitthis amendment to HHS for certification or approval.(4) Agencies which have already submitted their drug-free workplace plansto HHS for certification are not required to re-submit plans to HHS whichhave been amended to incorporate the provisions of section 628.f. Agency Compliance. Agencies or instrumentalities failing to comply withsection 628 by January 16, 1989, may be in violation of the Anti-deficiencyAct. Agencies or instrumentalities which anticipate problems with complianceshould immediately consult with their General Counsel.<ITAG tagnum="6">Constance Berry Newman,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Director.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Appendix</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. The (agency name) hereby adopts the following amendments to theDrug-Free Workplace plan referenced and attached.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">a. The following language is adopted as a free standing paragraphat the end of the section in the plan entitled ``policy'' or ``statementof policy'':</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">It is (agency name) policy that its workplace be free from the illegaluse, possession, or distribution of controlled substances, (as specifiedin Schedules I through V, as defined in 21 U.S.C. 802(6) and listed inPart B, Subchapter 13 of that Title) by the officers and employees of (agencyname). The possession and distribution of controlled substances will bedealt with promptly in accordance with legal and administrative disciplinaryprocedures. However, the policy's primary goal is to ensure that illegaldrug use is eliminated and that the (agency name) workplace be safe, healthful,productive, and secure.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">b. In any references to grounds for ``reasonable suspicion testing'',the term ``trafficking'' shall also mean ``distribution''.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">c. In addition to all grounds contained in this plan, there shallbe grounds for reasonable testing of an employee if the employee is thefocus of a criminal investigation into the illegal use, possession, ordistribution of controlled substances.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">d. Where authorities and guidance are cited in the plan as references,the following authority and guidance are added:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(i). Authority: Section 628 of the Treasury, Postal Service, and GeneralGovernment Appropriations Act of 1989, Pub. L. 100-440, as amended.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(ii). Guidance: Office of Personnel Management (OPM) Federal PersonnelManual (FPM) Letter 792-18, December 30, 1988, setting forth guidelinesto agencies, departments, and instrumentalities in establishing a drug-freeworkplace pursuant to Pub. L. 100-440.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. This amendment is effective upon the signature of the agency heador the senior management official authorized to sign for the agency head.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20"/><T2>XXXXX</T2><ITAG tagnum="20">Date</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Agency Head or Senior Management Official</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Attachment 1 to FPM Letter 792-19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Sample</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">[Agency Name]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Acknowledgement of Notice to Employees Whose Position is DesignatedSensitive for Drug Testing Purposes</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I acknowledge receiving notice of the establishment of [agency name]'semployee drug testing program. I understand that I may be selected forscreening by urinalysis testing for the presence of controlled substances.I understand that a verified positive result of that testing or refusalto submit to testing may result in disciplinary action up to and includingdismissal from the Federal service.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I have read the notice announcing the establishment of an employeedrug testing program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Printed or Typed Name</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">Signature of Employee</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20"/><T2>XXXXX</T2><ITAG tagnum="20">Date</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Attachment 2 to FPM Letter 792-19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Sample</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Consent For Release of Patient Information During or After Treatmentor Rehabilitation</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I, <T2>XXXXXX</T2> (Employee/Patient name), hereby consent to the disclosureof information concerning my progress in terminating illegal drug use.I authorize the <T2>XXXXXX</T2> (Treatment/Rehabilitation Facility) to disclose that informationto <T2>XXXXXX</T2> (Name), director of the Employee Assistance Program at<T2>XXXXXX</T2> (Name of Agency) and to <T2>XXXXXX</T2> (Name of supervisor), my supervisor and to the agency MedicalReview Official for drug use monitoring under Executive Order 12564, whichprovides for a drug-free Federal workplace.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I understand that this consent is subject to revocation at any time,except to the extent that action has been taken in reliance thereon, andthat it will expire without express revocation upon <T2>XXXXXX</T2> (date, event, condition).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This consent to disclose the above-described treatment records wasfreely given, without reservation, for the purpose set out above.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Signature of employee/patient)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Date on which consent is signed)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Clause for Use if Employee is a Minor or Legally Incompetent</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">I, <T2>XXXXXX</T2> (Name), the [parent/legal guardian or personal legal representative]of the above named employee/patient, hereby consent to the aforementionedrelease of information on his/her behalf.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="77">_</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20">(Signature)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="20"/><T2>XXXXXX</T2><ITAG tagnum="20">(Date)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74"> Attachment 3 to FPM Letter 792-19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Sample</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="71">Release Memorandum</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">Subject: Release of Patient Information</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">From: [Program making the disclosure.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">To: [Name or title of the person or organization to which the disclosureis to be made.]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">In accordance with the attached ``Consent for Release of Patient Information,''we have released information to you on [Patient's name].</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">This information has been disclosed to you from records whose confidentialityis protected by Federal law. <T3>See </T3>42 U.S.C. andSection; 290ee-3. Federal regulations, at 42 CFRpart 2, prohibit you from making any further disclosure of it without thespecific written consent of the person to whom it pertains, or as otherwisepermitted by those regulations. A general authorization for the releaseof medical or other information is NOT sufficient for this purpose.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">The Federal rules restrict any use of the information to criminallyinvestigate or prosecute any alcohol or drug abuse patient.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(Note: This memorandum is substantially the same as the one appearingin Appendix D of FPM Supplement 792-2.)</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Attachment 4 to FPM Letter 792-19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="110"><C>4,L2,i1,s100,r50,r100,15</C><T4>Operating EAP Consortia Contacts</T4><H1>Geographic location</H1><H1>Lead agency</H1><H1>Point of contact</H1><H1>FTS/Area code</H1><ITAG tagnum="1">Anchorage, AK <D>FAA </D><D>James Oliver </D><D>(907) 271-5875</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Atlanta, GA <D>PHS </D><D>Regina Bronson </D><D>242-0406 </D><P>(404) 331-0406</P></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Boston, MA <D>OPM </D><D>Jody Hubert </D><D>835-6533</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Upstate NY <D>HHS </D><D>Robert Pollio </D><D>264-2586</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Chicago, IL <D>PHS </D><D>Frances Wence </D><D>886-4215</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Cincinnati, OH <D>PHS </D><D>Frances Wence </D><D>886-4215</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Dallas, TX <D>PHS </D><D>Rosalie K. Phillips </D><D>729-3577</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Denver, CO <D>PHS </D><D>Dr. R. Lortscher </D><D>776-0078</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Kansas City, MO <D>CASU </D><D>John McClay </D><D>867-3501</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Long Island, NY <D>HHS </D><D>Robert Pollio </D><D>264-2586</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">State of Michigan <D>PHS </D><D>Frances Wence </D><D>886-4215</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">State of New Jersey <D>HHS </D><D>Robert Pollio </D><D>264-2586</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">New York City, NY <D>HHS </D><D>Robert Pollio </D><D>264-2586</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Philadelphia, PA <D>HHS </D><D>Brenda Wells </D><D>596-4757</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Seattle, WA <D>Army Corp of Engineers </D><D>John Barett, Jr. </D><D>(206) 764-3568</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Puerto Rico/Virgin Isl <D>HHS </D><D>Robert Pollio </D><D>264-2586</D></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="1">Washington, DC <D>PHS </D><D>Peter Mazzelle </D><D>443-4357</D></ITAG></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Attachment 5 to FPM Letter 792-19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Treatment Facilities Directories</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">1. <T3>National Directory of Drug Abuse and Alcoholism Treatment and PreventionProgram, </T3>Stock No. 017024-01252-1, Cost: $16.00. Available from: Superintendentof Documents, Government Printing Office, Washington, DC 20402, Tele: (202)783-3238</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">2. <T3>Washington Metropolitan Area Directory of Alcohol/Drug Treatment Resources,</T3>OPM WPS-01, September 1984, No Cost. Available from: Office of PersonnelManagement, Employee Health Services Branch (PSOG), 1900 E. Street, N.W.Room 7H39, Washington, DC 20415, Tele: (202) 632-5558</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">3. <T3>Coping Catalog </T3>(listing resources available in the WashingtonMetropolitan Area for alcohol, drugs and other addictions problems) Updatedcatalog expected to be available December 1986. Cost to be determined.Available from: The Washington Area Council on Alcohol and Drug Abuse,1221 Massachusetts Ave., N.W., Washington, DC 20005, Tele: (202) 783-1300</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="74">Attachment 6 to FPM Letter 792-19</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="73">Model Employee Assistance Program in Support of a Drug-Free Workplace</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">1. <T3>Purpose. </T3>To implement fully an effective Employee Assistance Program(EAP) within (agency) which provides short term counseling and referralservices to employees with drug problems. This is in keeping with the President'spolicy, set forth in Executive Order 12564, to eliminate drug use fromthe Federal workplace and to offer an opportunity for rehabilitation tousers of illegal drugs. This model is intended to supplement ongoing employeeassistance programs which, in addition to drug abuse, address alcohol abuseand other employee problems. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">2. <T3>Background. </T3>Public Law 92-255, as amended, requires Federal agenciesto develop and maintain appropriate prevention, treatment and rehabilitationprograms and services for drug abuse among Federal employees. Regulationsimplementing this requirement are contained in Title 5, Code of FederalRegulations (CFR) Part 792. Guidance is further provided in Subchapters5 and 6 of Federal Personnel Manual (FPM) Chapter 792, and FPM Supplement792-2. Executive Order 12564 of September 15, 1986, established furtherrequirements for agencies and employees in order to obtain a drug-freeFederal Workplace. On October 27, 1986, the President signed into law theOmnibus Drug Enforcement, Education, and Control Act of 1986, P.L. 99-570.That law reiterates Congressional concern about the prevention of illegaldrug use and the treatment of Federal employees who use drugs. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">3. <T3>Objective. </T3>The objective of the EAP is to assist employees withdrug problems to find treatment, to follow up with them during recoveryand rehabilitation, and to help them remain drug free. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">4. <T3>Policy. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. As an employer, the (agency) is concerned with the wellbeing ofits employees, the maintenance of the workforce productivity, and the preservationof a safe and secure workplace. The use of illegal drugs by (agency) employees,whether on or off the job, is inconsistent with these goals and will notbe tolerated. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The (agency) stands ready to assist employees in becoming drugfree. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. Employees who are users of illegal drugs are encouraged to seekcounseling and other appropriate assistance voluntarily, including thatavailable through the (agency's) Employee Assistance Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. The confidential nature of client records will be safeguarded andonly disclosed in accordance with the confidentiality provisions of Title42 CFR, Part 2. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. To the extent feasible, program services will be provided to familymembers dealing with the drug problem of an employee, or to an employeedealing with the drug problem of a family member. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">5. <T3>Program Responsibilities. </T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Agency Employee Assistance Program Administrator. </T3>The EmployeeAssistance Program Administrator has the lead role in ensuring that the(agency's) EAP program meets the requirements of E.O. 12564, and is responsiblefor the development, implementation and review of the agency EAP. In additionto supervising the headquarters EAP Coordinator and counselor(s), the Administratorwill provide advice and assistance in establishing field office EAP's.The EAP Administrator will advise agency components on the submission ofannual statistical reports and will prepare consolidated reports on theagency's EAP activity for submission to the Office of Personnel Managementon a fiscal year basis. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Employee Assistance Program Coordinators.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) The Employee Assistance Program Coordinator has responsibilityfor implementing and operating the EAP within an agency component, suchas the Headquarters office or a field installation. More than one coordinatormay be deemed necessary, depending on the size of the assigned component.Where the EAP services are contracted out, the coordinator has responsibilityfor monitoring the contractor performance and verifying services renderedwithin (agency). The person(s) selected for such assignments will be allocatedsufficient official time to: </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Implement effectively the agency employee assistance policy andprogram as well as to assist in the development and implementation of theagency drug testing program as it relates to the counseling and rehabilitationof drug-abusing employees; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Determine appropriate supervisory training and other activitiesneeded to educate and inform the workforce about drugs and symptoms ofdrug abuse; </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) develop and maintain counseling capability (through personnel,medical, or other counseling resource, including contracting out);</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Establish liaison with community education, treatment and rehabilitationfacilities; and,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Evaluate the program and report to management on results and effectiveness.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Employee Assistance Counselors. </T3>(1) In some instances, the EAPCoordinator may have the necessary skills, time and motivation to functionas the Employee Assistance Counselor. The Employee Assistance Counselorserves as the initial point of contact for employees who ask or are referredfor counseling, and will be allotted sufficient official time to implementthe program effectively. At a minimum, persons designated as Employee AssistanceCounselors should be, or provisions should be made for them to be:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(a) Familiar with the provisions of Executive Order 12564, ``Drug-FreeFederal Workplace'' and Federal Personnel Manual Letter 792-19, ``Establishinga Drug-Free Federal Workplace''.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(b) Trained in:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">_counseling employees in the occupational setting,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">_identification of drug abuse, and,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="25">_administering the Employee Assistance Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(c) Able to communicate effectively with employees, supervisors andmanagers concerning drug use and its symptoms and consequences.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(d) Knowledgeable about community resources for treatment and rehabilitationof drug users, including information on fees and payment schedules.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(e) Able to discuss drug treatment and rehabilitation insurance coverageavailable to employees through the Federal Employee Health Benefits Program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(f) Able to distinguish the occasional user from the addicted userand to suggest the appropriate treatment based on that information (e.g.,after hours attendance at Narcotics Anonymous meetings to significant medicalassistance).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(g) Able to provide training and education on drug abuse to employees,supervisors, union representatives, etc.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) In offices where counseling staff is not available within theagency, reasonable efforts should be made to provide employees with accessto a qualified counselor outside of the agency. This may include authorizingofficial time for the employee to visit or be visited by a counselor personally,or other steps which may be appropriate.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) For employees referred as a result of drug-testing, counselorsshould document the treatment plan prescribed. Signature on this documentby both the counselor and client will ensure mutual understanding of thetreatment plan and the consequences of failure to remain drug free.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) In order for the counselor to be viewed as the source of assistanceand understanding for employees, the person(s) performing these functionsshould not be involved in the actual drug testing of employees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. <T3>Employee's Role. </T3>All employees are encouraged to enhance theirdrug awareness through educational opportunities afforded by the EAP orthe community at large. Employees who are illegal drug users are encouragedto seek counseling assistance voluntarily. Employees found to be usersof illegal drugs are required to accept referral to the EAP and are urgedto cooperate with medical treatment and/or rehabilitation programs thatare indicated.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">E. <T3>Medical Personnel.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Employee health units provide emergency diagnoses and first treatmentof injury or illness of employees during duty hours. Where indicated, theemployee should be further referred to a private physician or communityhealth service. If such cases ultimately are determined to have stemmedfrom abuse of drugs, medical personnel should discuss the facts of thesituation with the supervisor and the employee and refer the employee forcounseling. A close working relationship with the EAP Counselor(s) is essentialfor program success. The Health Unit staff is available for consultationwith and assistance to personnel assigned EAP responsibilities.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Where such facilities do not exist, these services are providedwhenever possible through existing occupational health facilities and/orcommunity physicians or clinics.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">6. <T3>Training and Education.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Supervisory training. </T3>Employee counselors will conduct or otherwiseprovide training sessions for agency supervisors on the handling of problemsof substance abuse. Appropriate topics include:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Drug awareness and symptoms of drug use.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Recommended methods for dealing with the suspected or identifieddrug user.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Supervisory responsibilities under E.O. 12564.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(4) Confrontation and referral techniques.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(5) Explanation of the (agency) employee assistance program and itsrelationship with the (agency) drug testing program.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(6) General principles of rehabilitation including techniques forsupervisors to assist employees in returning to the worksite, given specific(agency) needs and requirements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(7) Personnel management issues (e.g., relationship of this programto performance appraisal and disciplinary programs; leave usage; and, supervisorynotes and documentation).</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Employee education</T3>. The Employee Assistance Coordinator will ensurethat employee seminars on topics dealing with drug use are provided periodically.Managers and supervisors shall encourage employee attendance at these seminarsand provide other appropriate support. On a continuing basis, educationalmaterials and information on drug abuse will be available to individualemployees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">7. <T3>Publicity of EAP to employees.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. This policy and program will be made known to all (agency) employees.All new employees will be informed of the services available under thisprogram as they enter on duty.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. The names and locations of Employee Assistance Counselor(s) shouldbe listed in telephone directories and displayed on employee bulletin boards.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. Periodic employee memoranda and other appropriate publicationsshould be used to keep employees informed of EAP services.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">8. <T3>Short-term Counseling and Referral.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. Referrals to the Employee Assistance Program are for the purposesof identifying the problem, referring the employee to the appropriate treatmentresource in the community and following up with the employee during recoveryand rehabilitation.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Voluntary referrals, </T3>or self referrals, are to be encouraged throughoutEAP materials.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. In the case of a <T3>management referral</T3> as a result of a verified positive drug screen,the employee assistance staff will interview and/or consult with supervisorsand management officials, as requested, and provide them with guidanceto how to refer the drug abusing employee to the assistance program. Oncethe referral is made, and the employee agrees to the appointment with thecounselor, the counselor will require the employee to sign a consent forrelease of information to the supervisor before assistance will be provided.This consent will cover the release of information pertaining to the employee'scompliance with the agreed upon treatment plan and the employee's progressduring and at the end of treatment. Upon obtaining the signed consent,the counselor will assess the problem(s), review the employee's healthinsurance coverage and refer the individual to an appropriate treatmentresource in the Community. The counselor will monitor the employee's treatmentand keep the supervisor advised as to the progress being made. The counselorwill periodically follow-up with the employee and his or her supervisorafter any treatment which occurs and offer support and assistance as needed.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">9. <T3>Community Resources. </T3>The EAP will develop a working relationshipwith community assistance resources. Program coordinators and counselorswill determine which community agencies or individuals best meet employeeand management needs. Contact should be established with specialized resourcessuch as the following:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. State drug authorities for help in identifying treatment resourcesfor drug abusing employees;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. Narcotics Anonymous for information on where and when meetingsare held;</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. Hospital and clinic treatment facilities in order to establisha working relationship between the counselor and the receiving treatmentsource; and,</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">D. Drug abuse councils to keep abreast of the latest development regardingdrug abuse.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">10. <T3>Program Interrelationships.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Relationship With Drug Testing Program. </T3>As called upon, the EAPstaff will work with the drug testing program staff in the developmentand implementation of the drug testing program. However, EAP staff arenot to be involved in the collection of urine samples or the initial reportingof drug test results. EAP efforts are to focus on counseling and rehabilitatingdrug-abusing employees, as well as on educating the workforce regardingdrug abuse and its symptoms.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Relationship of the Supervisor. </T3>Supervisors have explicit expectationsof their employees in terms of job performance and behavior. When supervisorsare advised of verified employee drug use, they are required to refer theemployee to an Employee Assistance Program and to initiate an appropriatepersonnel action. In those situations involving illegal drugs, except asprovided in section 5(b) of Executive Order 12564, disciplinary actionis required to be initiated against employees who are found to use illegaldrugs. Supervisors should work with the Employee Assistance Counselor tomonitor the employee's progress during treatment and rehabilitation andtake appropriate personnel action should the employee fail to remain drugfree.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">C. <T3>Relationship With Labor Organizations. </T3>The support and activeparticipation of labor organizations is a key element in the success ofan employee assistance program. Therefore, where there are units of exclusiverecognition, management should:</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(1) Communicate to labor organizations a strong commitment to providingassistance to employees.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(2) Consult or negotiate, as appropriate, concerning the implementationof the EAP.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">(3) Include union representatives in appropriate training and orientationprograms to ensure a mutual understanding of program policy, referral procedures,and other program elements.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">11. <T3>Recordkeeping and Reporting.</T3></ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">A. <T3>Counseling Records. </T3>Records on employees who have been referredfor counseling will be maintained in a secure and confidential manner.Information on any drug abuse client will be released only to the managementofficial empowered to recommend or take action, in accordance with theemployee's consent to release, and for the reasons identified in section8C above. Any information obtained by a supervisor from the counselor mustbe maintained, as with all employee records, in a strictly confidentialmanner. In addition, to the extent that counseling records include employeetreatment records, they shall be maintained in accordance with Public Law93-579 (Privacy Act), Public Law 93-282 and 42 CFR Part 2 (Confidentialityof Alcohol and Drug Abuse Patient Records). Consequently, access to theserecords will be strictly limited. All appropriate steps, including necessaryphysical safeguards, will be taken to ensure against unauthorized disclosure.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">B. <T3>Reports to OPM. </T3>The EAP Administrator will compile sufficientstatistical and programmatic data to provide the basis for evaluating theextent of drug abuse problems and effectiveness of the assistance program.The EAP Administrator will also submit agency-wide reports to the Officeof Personnel Management that contain data required by OPM to meet the statutoryreporting requirements contained in Public Law 99-570.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">12. <T3>Program Evaluation. </T3>The EAP Administrator and Coordinators willregularly evaluate their program to determine the effectiveness and efficiencyof services. These evaluations will include: services to employees withdrug abuse problems, referral procedures and effectiveness, supervisorytraining, employee orientation, reporting systems, availability and accessibilityof EAP, records systems, outreach activities, staffing and qualificationsprocedures. Written evidence of program evaluations, identified deficienciesand correction plans will be available for review by the EAP Administrator.Documented modifications in the program's assessment and intervention servicesshould be made based upon the findings of such evaluations.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 89-26573 Filed 11-9-89; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 6325-01-M</ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>